Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7007
Limitation on new applications.

There shall be no new applications filed under the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act after December 31, 2028. All applications and all tax credits pending or approved before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2022, LB1261, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 23.